Massachusetts, session 194th, H610.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 70 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking section 4 in its entirety, and inserting in place 
thereof the following section:-  
Section 4. There shall be a foundation budget review commission to review, every 5 
years, the way foundation budgets are calculated and to make recommendations for potential 
changes in those calculations as the commission deems appropriate. In conducting such review, 
the commission shall seek to determine the educational programs and services necessary to 
achieve the commonwealth's educational goals and to prepare students to achieve passing scores 
on the Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment System examinations or other designated 
statewide assessments. The review shall include, but not be limited to, those components of the 

of 3 11 foundation budget created pursuant to section 3 of chapter 70 and subsequent changes made to 
the foundation budget by law. In addition, the commission shall seek to determine and 
recommend measures to promote the adoption of ways in which resources can be most 
effectively utilized and consider various models of efficient and effective resource allocation. In 
carrying out the review, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall provide 
to the commission any data and information the commissioner considers relevant to the 
commission's charge.  
The commission shall include the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on 
education, who shall serve as co-chairs, the secretary of education, the commissioner of 
elementary and secondary education, the commissioner of early education and care, the speaker 
of the house of representatives or a designee, the president of the senate or a designee, the 
minority leader of the house of representatives or a designee, the minority leader of the senate or 
a designee, the governor or a designee, the chair of the house committee on ways and means or a 
designee, the chair of the senate committee on ways and means or a designee and 1 member to 
be appointed by each of the following organizations: the Massachusetts Municipal Association, 
Inc., the Massachusetts Business Alliance for Education, Inc., the Massachusetts Association of 
School Committees, Inc., the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, Inc., the 
Massachusetts Teachers Association, the American Federation of Teachers Massachusetts, the 
Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators, Inc., the Massachusetts Association of 
Regional Schools, Inc. and the Massachusetts Association of School Business Officials. 
Members shall not receive compensation for their services but may receive reimbursement for 
the reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their responsibilities as members of the 
commission. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall furnish reasonable 

of 3 34 staff and other support for the work of the commission. Prior to issuing its recommendations, the 
commission shall conduct not fewer than 4 public hearings across regions of the commonwealth. 
The commission shall be considered a special commission established by section 2A of chapter 4 
and shall be subject to the provisions of said section 2A of chapter 4. It shall not constitute a 
violation of chapter 268A for state employee or a person employed by a school district to serve 
on the commission or to participate in commission deliberations that may have a financial impact 
on the district employing that person, on the commonwealth, or on the rate at which that person 
may be compensated. The commission may establish procedures to ensure that no such person 
participates in commission deliberations that may directly affect the school districts employing 
those persons or that may directly affect the rate at which those persons are compensated.  
SECTION 2. The first report pursuant to this act shall be filed on or before November 1, 
2025.